Utah statutes.
4-20-10.   Promotion of multiple use of rangeland resources.

(1)  The department shall work cooperatively to promote efficient multiple-use management of the rangeland resources of the public lands administered by the federal Bureau of Land Management within the state to benefit the overall public interest.

(2)  The department may serve as an independent resource for mediating disputes concerning permit issues within the scope of Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 383, 2011 General Session

